Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.002

Intent.

This chapter is intended to enact state legislation that safeguards the public health and promotes public welfare by: (1) Protecting the consuming public from milk or milk products that are: (a) Unsafe; (b) produced under unsanitary conditions; (c) do not meet bacterial standards under the PMO; or (d) below the quality standards under Title 21 C.F.R. or administrative rules and orders adopted under this chapter; and (2) requiring licensing of all aspects of the dairy production and processing industry.

[ 1994 c 143 s 101.]